Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska74-1340
Crossings; department orders; violation; penalty.

When the owner of railroad tracks fails, neglects, or refuses promptly to comply with any order of the Department of Transportation issued under sections 74-1332 to 74-1339 or fails, refuses, or neglects to comply with such sections after the department has issued an order, the owner shall be guilty of a Class V misdemeanor and shall be fined in any sum not more than one hundred dollars for each such offense. Each week of such neglect, refusal, or failure shall constitute a separate offense.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. IV, § 18, p. 1404;

Laws 1994, LB 414, § 92;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 75-418;

Laws 1997, LB 255, § 12;

Laws 2017, LB339, § 262.